District of Columbia statutes.
22-1801

“Writing” and “paper” defined.

Except where otherwise provided for where such a construction would be unreasonable, the words “writing” and “paper,” wherever mentioned in this title, are to be taken to include instruments wholly in writing or wholly printed, or partly printed and partly in writing.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1336, ch. 854, § 904
Dec. 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-164,§ 601(b), 29 DCR 3976

History

1981 Ed., § 22-101.
1973 Ed., § 22-101.

Prior Codifications